Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Examinations and Licenses

§ 2421.
Eligibility.

An applicant is eligible for licensure who has:

reached the age of majority;

graduated from a school of veterinary medicine accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association or the Canadian Veterinary Medical Association; and

passed the North American Veterinary Licensing Examination (NAVLE), or any subsequent licensing examinations prepared under the authority of the National Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners (NBVME) or its successor organization.

Applicants who are not graduates of schools of veterinary medicine accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA) or Canadian Veterinary Medical Association (CVMA) shall possess a certificate issued by the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates (ECFVG), its successor organization, or an organization acceptable to the Board.

Upon submission of evidence acceptable to the Board of satisfaction of these eligibility criteria and upon payment of the required fees, the applicant shall receive a license; provided, however, that the Board may also require satisfactory completion of an examination covering State laws and rules related to the practice of veterinary medicine and the State or national veterinary codes of ethics.

For purposes of this section, an applicant’s score on the North American Veterinary Licensing Examination or any subsequent licensing examinations prepared under the authority of the National Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners, or its successor organization, shall be valid for two years from the date the applicant passed the examination.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 40

, § 30;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2422.
Application.

An application for a license shall be in writing and signed by the applicant, on forms furnished by the Office of Professional Regulation, setting forth facts concerning the applicant as the Board may require.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 2423.
Licensing standards and procedures.

Licensing standards and procedures established by the Board shall be fair and reasonable and shall be designed and implemented to measure and reasonably ensure an applicant’s qualifications to practice the occupation. They shall not be designed or implemented for the purpose of limiting the size of the occupation.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2424.
Licensure by endorsement.

The Board, or Office of Professional Regulation on its behalf, shall, upon application and payment of the required fee, issue a license without a written national examination to a person who:

holds a current license in good standing in another U.S. or Canadian jurisdiction whose licensing standards are substantially equivalent to those of Vermont; and

has met the continuing education requirements.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the Board may require that an applicant for licensure without examination satisfactorily complete an examination covering State laws and rules related to the practice of veterinary medicine and the State or national veterinary codes of ethics.

As used in this section, “in good standing” means that the applicant:

has not:

been the subject of any administrative penalties regarding his or her practice of veterinary medicine, including fines, formal reprimands, license suspension, or revocations, except for license revocations for nonpayment of license renewal fees;

been the subject of probationary limitations; or

entered into any “consent agreements” that contain conditions placed by a regulatory board on his or her professional conduct and practice, including any voluntary surrender of a license;

has never had his or her U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration privileges restricted or revoked;

is not currently under investigation by another veterinary licensing authority;

has no physical or mental impairment related to drugs, alcohol, or a finding of mental incompetence by a physician that would limit the applicant’s ability to undertake the practice of veterinary medicine in a manner consistent with the safety of a patient or the public;

has not been convicted of a felony; or

has no criminal conviction record nor pending criminal charge relating to an offense that relates substantially to the practice of veterinary medicine. An applicant who has a criminal conviction record or against whom criminal charges are pending shall arrange for the appropriate authorities to provide information about the record or charge directly to the Board. Information provided under this subdivision shall be sufficiently specific to enable the Board to determine whether the record or charge is substantially related to the practice of veterinary medicine.

An applicant who is not in good standing shall be eligible for licensure under this subsection, if the applicant can demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the Board, that he or she is otherwise qualified for licensure under this section. The Board may place limitations on licenses issued under this subsection or establish conditions of probation prior to the issuance of a license.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1985, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

1995, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 40

, § 31;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. June 27, 2002;

2007, No. 29

, § 35;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 2425.
Certificate of licensure.

The Board shall license as a veterinarian each applicant who proves to the satisfaction of the Board his or her fitness for licensure under the terms of this chapter. It shall issue to each person licensed a certificate of licensure, which shall be prima facie evidence of the right of the person to whom it is issued to practice as a licensed veterinarian or to represent himself or herself as a licensed veterinarian, subject to the conditions and limitations of this chapter.

If a licensee has a principal place of business for the practice of veterinary medicine, a license shall be prominently displayed at that place.

Licenses may not be transferred.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1.

§ 2426.
Renewal of license.

On a schedule established by the Office of Professional Regulation, a licensed veterinarian shall pay to the Secretary of State a renewal fee in the amount prescribed by section 2414 of this title, and shall receive a license card bearing his or her name, address, registration number, and the date of expiration of the license.

A person shall not be required to pay renewal fees for years during which the license was lapsed.

As a condition of renewal, a licensee shall complete continuing veterinary medical education, approved by the Board by rule, during the preceding two-year period. For purposes of this subsection, the Board may require, by rule, not more than 24 hours of approved continuing veterinary medical education as a condition of renewal.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 2427.
Repealed. 2009, No. 35, § 41(a).

§ 2428.
Reinstatement.

A license that has lapsed for five years or longer may be reinstated upon successful completion of national board licensing examinations within the previous two years or upon proof that the licensee has actively practiced licensed clinical veterinary medicine for 3,000 hours during the preceding three years in another U.S. or Canadian jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 67

, § 1; amended

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2005, No. 27

, § 71;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 27.